incubator/apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="t/ann__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anni</l>
          <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ann</l>
          <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ennene</l>
          <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enner</l>
          <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="u__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tup/é__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eane</l>
          <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>een</l>
          <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>é<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tyr/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="talefeil__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tån/agl__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aglen</l>
          <r>agl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agl</l>
          <r>agl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eglene</l>
          <r>agl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>egler</l>
          <r>agl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="valutaomsetning__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vinb/onde__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øndene</l>
          <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onden</l>
          <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ønder</l>
          <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onde</l>
          <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="termin/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iane</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usen</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="T__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>T</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tus/ul__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lane</l>
          <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulen</l>
          <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ul</l>
          <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tuftebonde"><i>tufteb</i><par n="vinb/onde__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sovekupé"><i>sovekup</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="undertann"><i>undert</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tupé"><i>tup</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="varieté"><i>variet</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snarkafé"><i>snarkaf</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stopul"><i>stop</i><par n="tus/ul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vadmålsbonde"><i>vadmålsb</i><par n="vinb/onde__n"/></e>
    <e lm="støyttann"><i>støytt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vagle"><i>vagl</i><par n="tyr/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soaré"><i>soar</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tristreksfeil"><i>tristreksfeil</i><par n="talefeil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tusul"><i>tus</i><par n="tus/ul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trestreksfeil"><i>trestreksfeil</i><par n="talefeil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="valkomité"><i>valkomit</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spondé"><i>spond</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vassbakkelse"><i>vassbakkels</i><par n="tyr/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="traké"><i>trak</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tvitann"><i>tvit</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tånagl"><i>tån</i><par n="tån/agl__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stifttann"><i>stiftt</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vestlandsbonde"><i>vestlandsb</i><par n="vinb/onde__n"/></e>
    <e lm="supé"><i>sup</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stortingskomité"><i>stortingskomit</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sofabonde"><i>sofab</i><par n="vinb/onde__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tomatpuré"><i>tomatpur</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tyttebærgelé"><i>tyttebærgel</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="troké"><i>trok</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tyre"><i>tyr</i><par n="tyr/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="talefeil"><i>talefeil</i><par n="talefeil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strete"><i>stret</i><par n="tyr/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stygge"><i>stygg</i><par n="tyr/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="valutaomsetjing"><i>valutaomsetjing</i><par n="valutaomsetning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tann"><i>t</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spermie"><i>spermi</i><par n="tyr/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="solfjerne"><i>solfjern</i><par n="tyr/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="u"><i>u</i><par n="u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="solidaritetskomité"><i>solidaritetskomit</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vondul"><i>vond</i><par n="tus/ul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sufflé"><i>suffl</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voksterfeil"><i>voksterfeil</i><par n="talefeil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vekstfeil"><i>vekstfeil</i><par n="talefeil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vinbonde"><i>vinb</i><par n="vinb/onde__n"/></e>
    <e lm="valutaomsetting"><i>valutaomsetting</i><par n="valutaomsetning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trykkfeil"><i>trykkfeil</i><par n="talefeil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tytebærgelé"><i>tytebærgel</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terylene"><i>terylen</i><par n="tyr/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trasé"><i>tras</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terminus"><i>termin</i><par n="termin/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stimulus"><i>stimul</i><par n="termin/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uttalefeil"><i>uttalefeil</i><par n="talefeil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vrangtvitann"><i>vrangtvit</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stamkafé"><i>stamkaf</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turné"><i>turn</i><par n="tup/é__n"/></e>
    <e lm="valutaomsetning"><i>valutaomsetning</i><par n="valutaomsetning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="storbonde"><i>storb</i><par n="vinb/onde__n"/></e>
    <e lm="T"><i>T</i><par n="T__n"/></e>
    <e lm="visdomstann"><i>visdomst</i><par n="t/ann__n"/></e>
